District of Columbia statutes.
42-3671.09

Renegotiations and extension.

(a)

Renegotiation shall occur when an existing lease-purchase agreement is satisfied and replaced by a new agreement undertaken by the same lessor and consumer. A renegotiation shall be considered a new agreement requiring new disclosures; provided, that renegotiation shall not include events of the following nature:

(1)

The addition or return of property in a multiple-item agreement or the substitution of the lease property if the average payment allocable to the payment period is not changed by more than 25%;

(2)

A deferral or extension of one or more periodic payments, or portions of a periodic payment;

(3)

A reduction in charges in the lease or agreement; or

(4)

A lease agreement involved in a court proceeding.

(b)

No disclosures shall be required for an extension of a lease-purchase agreement.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-99, § 10, 49 DCR 1000

History